California statutes. Vehicle Code
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all fines and forfeitures collected for violations of Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) shall be deposited in the appropriate fund in the county where the violation occurred and distributed in the same manner as specified in Section 42201.5, and shall be used for enforcing laws related to the operation of off-highway motor vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42205.

(a) Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 42270), the department shall file, at least monthly with the Controller, a report of money received by the department pursuant to Section 9400 for the previous month and shall, at the same time, remit all money so reported to the Treasurer. On order of the Controller, the Treasurer shall deposit all money so remitted into the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund, or directly into the Transportation Debt Service Fund as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 9400.4, as applicable.

(b) The Legislature shall appropriate from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund to the
 department and the Franchise Tax Board amounts equal to the costs incurred by each in performing their duties pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 9400) of Chapter 6 of Division 3. The applicable amounts shall be determined so that the appropriate costs for registration and weight fee collection activities are appropriated between the recipients of revenues in proportion to the revenues that would have been received individually by those recipients if the total fee imposed under the Vehicle License Fee Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) was 2 percent of the market value of a vehicle. The remainder of the funds collected under Section 9400 and deposited in the account, other than the direct deposits to the Transportation Debt Service Fund referenced in subdivision (a), may be appropriated to the Department of Transportation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the Department of Motor Vehicles for the purposes authorized under
 Section 3 of Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 15.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Refund of Fees and Penalties [42230. - 42235.]

42230.

Whenever any application made under this code is accompanied by any fee, except an application for an occupational license accompanied by a fee as specified in Section 9262, 9262.5, 11309, or 11820, or an application for a duplicate driver’s license, as required by law, and the application is refused or rejected, the fees shall be returned to the applicant, except that, whenever any application is made for the first set of special plates under subdivision (a) of Section 9262 and the application is refused or rejected, the fee for the special plates only shall be returned to the applicant or, when application is made for the first set of special plates under subdivision (1) of Section 9264 and the application is refused or rejected, the fee for the special plates shall be returned to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42231.

Whenever any application is made under this code and the application is accompanied by any fee which is excessive or not legally due, or whenever the department in consequence of any error either of fact or of law as to the proper amount of any fee or any penalty thereon or as to the necessity of obtaining any privilege under this code collects any fee or penalty which is excessive, erroneous, or not legally due, the person who has paid the erroneous or excessive fee or penalty, or his agent on his behalf, may apply for and receive a refund of the amount thereof as provided in this article, or the department may refund the same within three years after the date of the payment or collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

42232.

The application for refund shall be presented to the department in a format prescribed by the department within three years from the date of payment of the erroneous or excessive fee or penalty and shall identify the payment made and state the grounds upon which it is claimed that the payment was excessive or erroneous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42233.

(a) Whenever any fee or penalty subject to refund under Section 42231 after application therefor has not been paid into the State Treasury, the department shall refund the fee or penalty.

(b) Whenever any fee or penalty subject to refund under Section 42231 after application therefor or Section 10901 of the Revenue and Taxation Code has been paid into the State Treasury to the credit, in whole or in part, of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund (hereafter referred to in this section as the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account), or to the credit, in whole or in part, of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund (hereafter referred to in this section as the Motor Vehicle Account), the department shall prepare a claim setting forth the facts pertaining to the fee or penalty sought to be refunded, and the State Controller shall draw his warrant upon the account or accounts to which the fee or penalty was credited. In lieu of filing claims for refund against both the Motor Vehicle Account and the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account when an amount has been determined to be due from both accounts, the director may file a single claim with the State Controller, drawn against the Motor Vehicle Account covering the amount of both refunds, and the State Controller shall thereupon draw his warrant on the Motor Vehicle Account. At least quarterly, the director shall certify to the State Controller the amounts paid from the Motor Vehicle Account which are properly chargeable to the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account supported by such detail as the State Controller may require. Upon order of the State Controller, the amounts so required shall be transferred from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account.

(c) This section is an appropriation of any and all amounts necessary to refund and repay any excessive or erroneous fees and penalties collected under this code, and the procedure prescribed in this article for refunds shall be deemed a compliance with the requirements of the Government Code relating to the refund of excessive or erroneous fees or penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

42235.

Whenever the department collects any fee which is excessive or not legally due and application for the refund of the fee is not filed within the time prescribed by law because the applicant failed to receive from the department a certificate of registration for the vehicle upon which the refund of fee is sought, the director shall have the power to authorize the payment of a refund in such a case upon a proper showing by the applicant that the delay in applying for the refund was due to the failure to receive the certificate of registration within the statutory period allowed for making application for refund of fees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Uncollectible Costs [42240. - 42240.]

42240.

On and after January 1, 2022, the unpaid balance of any court-imposed costs pursuant to Section 40508.5 and subdivision (g) of Section 40510.5, as those sections read on December 31, 2021, shall be unenforceable and uncollectible and any portion of a judgment imposing those costs shall be vacated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 257, Sec. 45.   (AB 177)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Motor Vehicle Account [42270. - 42277.]

42270.

(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol each shall file, at least monthly with the Controller, a report of money received by the department covering all fees for applications accepted by the department and all other moneys received by the department under this code and, at the same time, shall remit all money so reported to the Treasurer. On order of the Controller, the Treasurer shall deposit in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, into which is merged the Motor Vehicle Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, all moneys so reported and remitted.

Any reference in any law or regulation to the Motor Vehicle Fund, or to the Motor Vehicle Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, shall be deemed to refer to the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, which is created by subdivision (a) of Section 42271.

(b) The amount of any penalties collected by the department pursuant to Sections 9553 and 9554 of this code and Sections 10770 and 10854 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall, for purposes of subdivision (a), be deemed to be a percentage of the weight fee, registration fee, and vehicle license fee obtained when applying the total of these fees collected, excluding use tax, against the individual weight fees, registration fees, and vehicle license fees collected on each application. Penalties which cannot be allocated in accordance with this subdivision shall be allocated according to subdivision (c).

(c) The amount of any penalties collected by the department, as provided in Sections 9553 and 9554 of this code and Sections 10770 and 10854 of the Revenue and Taxation Code which cannot be allocated in accordance with subdivision (b), shall, for the purposes of subdivision (a), be deemed to be a percentage of the total fees allocated under this section and under Section 11001 of the Revenue and Taxation Code equal to that percentage of the ratio based on the fees previously allocated under this section and under Section 11001 of the Revenue and Taxation Code in the fiscal year preceding the calendar year for which the penalties are to be allocated. That ratio shall be reevaluated periodically and shall be adjusted to reflect any change in the fee structure that may be provided in this code or in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) Whenever any fee paid to the department has not been allocated within one year of the date of collection, the fee shall be allocated to the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, and the Motor Vehicle Account and the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund, in proportion to the revenue allocated to those accounts by the department in the previous fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42271.

(a) The Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund is hereby created.

(b) The moneys deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund which are appropriated in the Budget Act or any other appropriation act for the support of or expenditure by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be expended by the department in carrying out the provisions of this code and in enforcing any other laws relating to vehicles or the use of highways.

Regularly employed peace officers of the department may, when authorized by the director, expend such sums as authorized for the purchase of counterfeit, false, forged, or fictitious certificates of ownership, registration card, certificate, license or special plate or permit, or driver’s license provided for by this code as evidence, or for expenditures related to the procurement of such evidence, or for expenditures made to investigate other violations of laws administered by the department. When approved by the director, the identity of a peace officer who submits a claim need not be disclosed if the disclosure might materially prejudice the investigation.

The sums so expended shall be repaid to the peace officer making the expenditure upon claims approved by the director. The claims, when approved, shall be paid out of funds appropriated or made available by law for the support of the department.

(c) The moneys deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund which are appropriated in the Budget Act or any other appropriation act for the support of or expenditure by the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall be expended by the department in carrying out the provisions of this code and in enforcing any other laws relating to vehicles or the use of highways. The Department of the California Highway Patrol may draw, without at the time furnishing vouchers and itemized statements, sums not to exceed in the aggregate one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the sums so drawn to be used as a revolving fund where cash advances are necessary. At the close of each fiscal year, the moneys so drawn shall be accounted for and substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements submitted to and audited by the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

42272.

For the 2012–13 fiscal year, upon order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer four hundred thirty-two million two hundred thousand dollars ($432,200,000) from the Motor Vehicle Account to the General Fund as a loan, provided that the loan shall be repaid. The Director of Finance shall order the repayment by the Controller of that four hundred thirty-two million two hundred thousand dollars ($432,200,000) to the Motor Vehicle Account no later than June 30, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 22, Sec. 8.   (AB 1465)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42273.

By the 10th day of each calendar month, the balance remaining to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund at the close of business on the last day of the preceding calendar month, after payments of refunds and administration and enforcement, that is not needed for immediate use from the Motor Vehicle Account shall, on order of the State Controller, be transferred to the credit of the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

42275.

Notwithstanding Section 42273, the State Controller may, after at least 15 days’ prior notice, transfer back to the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund amounts transferred to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund pursuant to that section to pay costs incurred against other appropriations from the Motor Vehicle Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

42276.

Not later than January 10, 1985, and not later than January 10th of each four-year period thereafter, the Secretary of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency shall submit a report to the Legislature on a study of the fees imposed under this code, including any finding or recommendation on changes in the fees necessary to generate sufficient revenues for the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund to finance those operations of state government to be financed from those revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 541, Sec. 39.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

42277.

No money in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund may be expended for automobile driver training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

